Massachusetts, session 194th, H2088.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1J of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clause (8) of subsection (d); and striking out
in clause (9) of subsection (d) the words “of practices” each time they appear; and by striking out
subsection (g); and by striking out the period at the end of the first sentence in subsection (i) and
adding the words: “subject to Chapter 150E.”; and by striking out in the third paragraph of
subsection (k) the second sentence; and by striking out clause (7) of subsection (o); and by
striking out in clause (9) of sub-section (o) the words: “or practices” each time they appear; and
by striking out the period at the end of the first sentence in subsection (s) and adding the words:
“subject to Chapter 150E.”.
SECTION 2. Section 1K of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clause (5) of subsection (d); and by striking
out in clause (8) of subsection (d) the words “or practices” each time they appear; and by striking
of 2

out subsection (e); and by striking out in line 323 of subsection (h) the words: “contracts,
collective bargaining agreements or”.
of 2